Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1401
Act, how cited.

Sections 35-1401 to 35-1408 shall be known and may be cited as the Volunteer Emergency Responders Job Protection Act.

Laws 2008, LB1096, § 5.